Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 31
OVERCHARGES

Section

40-31-101. Railroad company claim agent.

Every railroad corporation or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same doing business in this state shall have and keep an agent or other person residing and having his office in the principal city or town along its line within the state whose duty it is and who is fully authorized by such railroad company to adjust and settle all claims for overcharge collected within this state and for all loss or damage. Any railroad corporation or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person so doing business in this state who fails to have and keep such agent or representative within such city or town shall be subject to a penalty of three thousand dollars for each and every month during which said railroad company or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person fails to have and keep said agent, which said penalty shall be recovered by the attorney general for the use of the state in an action commenced for that purpose in any court of competent jurisdiction of this state.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 204, § 1.

G.S.

§ 2799.

R.S. 08:

§ 5513.

C.L.

§ 2893.

CSA:

C. 139, § 79.

CRS 53:

§ 116-12-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-12-1.

Cross references:

For the lien of common carrier on goods and baggage, see § 38-20-105; for the general claim agent being required to have headquarters at general offices, see § 40-21-102.

40-31-102. Overcharges - recovery - damages.

All overcharges made by any such railroad corporation or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same and all claims for loss or damage shall be paid by the representative of such railroad corporation or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same, appointed as provided in section 40-31-101, within sixty days after the same has been duly presented to such representative or agent for settlement accompanied by the expense bill of the freight on which such overcharge has been made or loss or damage suffered, together with a statement, properly verified, of the amount of such overcharge, loss, or damage. If any such railroad corporation or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same fails to refund the amount of such overcharge, loss, or damage within the time aforesaid, the person or corporation so suffering the same may recover from the railroad company or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same so in default the sum of one hundred dollars for each month and fraction of a month during which said company or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same is in default, which said sum may be recovered by the parties so aggrieved or their assignees in any court of competent jurisdiction.

In any suit brought under this section, service upon such agent or representative of said railroad company or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same shall be deemed and held proper service upon such railroad company or the lessee or receiver thereof or other person operating the same; but the claimant shall not recover such penalty unless he recovers a larger amount in a court than the sum tendered him by such railroad corporation, agent, representative, lessee, or receiver or other person.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 205, § 2.

G.S.

§ 2800.

R.S. 08:

§ 5514.

C.L.

§ 2894.

CSA:

C. 139, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 116-12-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-12-2.